en: Extra light maple syrups, AA maple syrups
fr: Sirops d'érable extra clair, Sirop d'érable AA
hr: Ekstra lagani javorov sirup
nl: Extra Lichte Esdoornstropen

en: Light maple syrups, A maple syrups
fr: Sirops d'érable clairs, Sirops d'érable clair, Sirop d'érable A
hr: Svijetli javorov sirup
nl: Lichte esdoornstropen

en: Medium maple syrups, B maple syrups
fr: Sirops d'érable moyen, Sirops d'érable moyens, Sirop d'érable B
hr: Srednji javorov sirup
nl: Medium esdoornstropen

en: Amber maple syrups, C maple syrups
fr: Sirops d'érable ambrés, Sirops d'érable ambré, Sirop d'érable C
hr: Jantarni javorov sirup
nl: Amber esdoornstropen
zh: 琥珀色枫糖浆

en: Dark maple syrups, D maple syrups
de: Ahornsirups dunkel
fr: Sirops d'érable foncés, Sirops d'érable foncé, Sirop d'érable D
hr: Tamni javorov sirup
nl: Donkere esdoornstropen

en: Molasses, Cane molasses, Blackstrap molasses
es: Melazas de caña, Melazas, Melaza, Miel de caña, Melaza de caña
fr: Mélasses, Mélasse de canne
hr: Melasa
nl: Melasses, Rietsuikermelasses

en: Vegetables based foods
bg: Зеленчукови храни
ca: Aliments amb base de verdures
da: Grøntsagsbaserede fødevarer
de: Gemüsebasierte Lebensmittel
es: Verduras y hortalizas y sus productos, Verduras y hortalizas y derivados
fi: Kasviperäiset ruoat
fr: Légumes et dérivés
he: מזון מבוסס ירקות
hr: Hrana na bazi povrća
hu: Zöldség alapú élelmiszerek
it: Cibi a base di verdure
ja: 野菜
lt: Daržovės ir jų kilmės maisto produktai
nl: Groente en afgeleide producten
pl: Produkty na bazie warzyw
pt: Alimentos à base de vegetais
ru: блюда из овощей
sv: Matvaror baserade på grönsaker
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากพืช
tr: Sebze yiyecekler, Sebze gıdaları, Sebze besinleri, Sebze kaynaklı yiyecekler, Sebze kaynaklı gıdalar, Sebze kaynaklı besinler
zh: 蔬菜类食品

en: Leeks fondue, Slow-simmered leeks
fr: Fondue de poireau

en: Vegetables
da: Grøntsager, Grønsager
de: Gemüse
es: Hortalizas, Vegetales, Verduras
fi: Kasvikset
fr: Légumes
hr: Povrće
nl: Groenten, Groente
pl: warzywa
pt: Vegetais
ru: Овощи
sv: Grönsaker
zh: 蔬菜

en: Thinly-shredded vegetables
fr: Julienne de légumes

en: Diced vegetables
da: Ternede grøntsager
fr: Brunoise de légumes

en: Root vegetables, root vegetable
da: Rodfrugter
fr: Légumes-racines, légume-racine

en: Vegetables from Germany, German vegetables
da: Tyske grøntsager, Grøntsager fra Tyskland
fr: Légumes allemands
hr: Povrće iz Njemačke
lt: Vokiškos daržovės

en: Garlics and their products, Garlic and their products
da: Hvidløg og hvidløgsprodukter
de: Knoblauch und Knoblauchprodukte
es: Ajos y derivados
fi: Valkosipulit ja valkosipulituotteet
fr: Ails et dérivés, Ail et dérivés
he: שום ומוצריו
hr: Češnjak i njihovi proizvodi
hu: Fokhagyma és belőle készült termékek
it: Aglio e derivati
nl: Knoflook en -afgeleide producten
sv: Vitlökar och vitlöksprodukter

en: Wild garlic, Ramsons
da: Ramsløg
de: Bärlauch
fr: Ail des ours
hr: Divlji češnjak
la: Allium ursinum
nb: Ramsløk
nn: Ramslauk
pl: Czosnek niedźwiedzi
sv: Ramslök

en: Dried wild garlic
da: Tørret ramsløg
pl: Czosnek niedźwiedzi suszony
sv: Torkad ramslök

en: Onions and their products
bg: Лук и лучени продукти
de: Zwiebelprodukte, Zwiebeln und ihre Produkte
es: Cebollas y derivados
fi: sipulit ja sipulituotteet
fr: Oignons et dérivés
hr: Luka i njegovih proizvoda
hu: Hagyma és hagyma alaú termékek
it: Cipolle e derivati
la: Allium cepa
nl: Ui en afgeleide producten
pt: Cebolas e derivados
tr: Soğan ve soğan ürünleri

en: Fried onions
da: Ristede løg
de: Röstzwiebeln
es: Cebollas fritas
fi: paistetut sipulit
fr: Oignons frits
hr: Prženi luk
hu: Sült hagyma
it: Cipolle fritte
nl: Gebakken uien

en: Dried fried onions
nl: Gedroogde gebakken ui

en: Dried onions
fr: Oignons séchés